District of Columbia statutes.
38-2021.06

Annuity of teachers retired for disability.

The annuity of a teacher retiring under § 38-2021.04 shall be at least: (1) forty per centum of the average salary or; (2) the sum obtained under § 38-2021.05 after increasing his total service by the period elapsing between the date of separation and the date he attains the age of 60 years, whichever is the lesser.

Aug. 7, 1946, 60 Stat. 878, ch. 779, § 6
Mar. 6, 1952, 66 Stat. 19, ch. 95,§ 5
June 4, 1957, 71 Stat. 47, Pub. L. 85-46, § 1
This section is referenced in § 38-2021.04.
1981 Ed., § 31-1229.
1973 Ed., § 31-726.